Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201413-2702
Purpose of act.

The purpose of the Civic and Community Center Financing Act
is to support the development of civic, community, and recreation centers throughout Nebraska.
Furthermore, the act is intended to support projects that foster maintenance
or growth of communities.

Laws 1999, LB 382, § 14;

Laws 2011, LB297, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB153, § 2.